Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1470
Campaign statements; public information; copies, cost; duration kept.

(1) Campaign statements shall be open for public inspection and reproduction, commencing as soon as practicable, but not later than the fifth business day following the day on which they were received, during regular business hours.

(2) Copies of statements or parts of statements shall be provided by the officials with whom they are filed at a cost of not to exceed fifty cents per page.

(3) Campaign statements shall be preserved for a period of not less than eighteen months by the officials other than the commission with whom they are filed, and not less than five years by the commission.

(4) No fee or charge shall be collected by any official for the filing of any campaign statement, or for the forms upon which statements are to be prepared, except as otherwise provided by law.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 70;

Laws 1983, LB 479, § 1.